West Virginia, session 2026, SB457.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. STATE PUBLIC HEALTH SYSTEM. §16-1-9h. Provision of house water filtration for residents in designated areas. (a) The Legislature finds that water quality is essential to the health of all West Virginians.  Despite the efforts of local and state government, and the intent to provide high quality water for residents, there are areas in the state in which the water has high levels of contaminants. If drinking water contains unsafe levels of contaminants, it can cause health effects, such as gastrointestinal illnesses, nervous system or reproductive effects, and chronic diseases such as cancer. Factors that can influence whether a contaminant will lead to health effects include the type of contaminant, its concentration in the water, individual susceptibility, the amount of water consumed, and the duration of exposure.  Water containing high levels of contaminants are not only unsafe for drinking but may also be unsafe for other household purposes like bathing. (b) The Department of Health shall establish a program to examine water quality from public water systems throughout the state and determine thresholds of various contaminants that may make the use of that water unsafe for residents.  If a public water source is found to exceed any level of contaminant, and deemed unsafe, the department shall provide water filtration equipment or technology to residents served by that water source.  Factors to be considered in making determinations regarding water quality are levels of contaminants, including per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, microorganisms, inorganic chemicals, organic chemicals, and disinfection byproducts, as well as any other factor the department determines to be necessary.(c) The department may propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. to effectuate the provisions of this section.